California, session 20252026, AB1122.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) Dual enrollment is an equity-based solution to increasing a college-attending culture for pupils across the state.(2) Data has demonstrated that dual enrollment programs increase postsecondary degree attainment and therefore, increasing dual enrollment opportunities will help achieve the Governor’s goal of 70 percent postsecondary degree and certificate attainment among working-aged Californians by 2030.(3) According to the Public Policy Institute of California (PPIC), 82 percent of pupils who participate in a College and Career Access Pathway (CCAP) partnership enroll in college within one year of graduating from high school, compared to the state average of 66 percent. They also found that CCAP students obtain associate degrees or certificates at higher rates than nondual enrollees. Moreover, the PPIC found that the average first-year grade point average in community colleges is much higher among CCAP students than nondual enrollees but lower than peers from other dual enrollment programs. They also found that CCAP students complete gateway transfer-level mathematics and English courses at a higher rate than pupils who did not participate in dual enrollment programs.(4) In 2022, the Governor issued a roadmap with terms and conditions that the community colleges must comply with through the 2026–27 fiscal year. The Governor included two goals related to dual enrollment, as follows:(A) Increase the percentage of elementary and secondary education pupils who graduate with 12 or more college units earned through dual enrollment by 15 percent.(B) Close equity gaps in access to dual enrollment programs.(5) In 2023, the Governor issued an executive order that requested educational agencies and others to work together to support student pathways and career success through the Master Plan for Career Education with three goals centered on (A) career pathways, (B) hands-on learning and real-life learning, and (C) universal access and affordability.(6) The Governor describes the purposes of the Master Plan for Career Education as a strategic move to align state education and workforce development programs with the needs of the future economy. It aims to streamline those programs regionally and across state agencies and ensure that California’s students and adult learners have affordable access to needed educational and career development opportunities throughout their working lives.(7) In 2024, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges approved Vision 2030: A Roadmap for California Community Colleges, a “collaborative action plan that provides focus, equity, and direction to our community colleges.” Within its framework, its 9th grade strategy works toward a future where all California high school pupils enroll in community college transfer, career, or apprenticeship pathways and complete high school with at least 12 units of dual enrollment credit.(b) To fulfill the goals outlined in the Governor’s community college roadmap, the goals for the Master Plan for Career Education, and the California Community College’s Vision 2030, it is the intent of the Legislature to reform dual enrollment programs in California to accomplish both of the following:(1) Close equity gaps in access and successful outcomes for elementary and secondary education pupils.(2) Have every school district provide dual enrollment opportunities for elementary and secondary education pupils by 2030.SEC. 2. Section 76005 is added to the Education Code, immediately following Section 76004, to read:76005. (a) Commencing with the 2029–30 academic year, a local educational agency serving high school pupils that does not have an existing dual enrollment program shall establish a dual enrollment program through a formal partnership or agreement with the governing board of a community college district, with the goal of developing seamless pathways from high school to community college postsecondary educational institutions and helping high school pupils achieve college and career readiness.(b) If a local educational agency does not have an existing dual enrollment program, the local educational agency is encouraged to shall establish a formal partnership through an existing program, including a College and Career Access Pathways partnership, consistent with the requirements of Section 76004, an early college high school, as described in Section 11302, or a middle college high school, as described in Section 11300.(c) Courses offered through a dual enrollment program pursuant to this section shall lead to a degree, credential, certificate, or transfer.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.